North Dakota, session 69, HB1615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 53-06.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. An eligible organization shall apply for a license to conduct only bingo, electronic quick shot
bingo, raffles, calcuttas, pull tabs, punchboards, twenty-one, paddlewheels, poker, or sports
pools by:
a. First securing approval for a site authorization from the governing body of the city or
county in which the proposed site is located. Approval, which may be granted at the
discretion of the governing body,The approved authorization must be recorded on a site
authorization form that is to accompany the license application to the attorney general for
final approval. An eligible organization may request a specific site location on the site
authorization form.
(1) A governing body may deny a site authorization only in accordance with an
ordinance or written policy adopted or amended following public comment. Under
the ordinance or policy, the governing body:
(a) May not require an eligible organization to donate net proceeds to the city,
county, or related political subdivision or for community programs or services
within the city or county as a condition for receiving a site authorization from
the city or county;
(b) May not deny a site authorization solely because the eligible organization has
not conducted gaming at the site;
(c) May not require that an eligible organization be located at a specific site or
require a site to enter a lease with a specific organization as a condition of
site authorization;
(d) May require a signed agreement between an eligible organization and a site
owner before approving a site authorization. The agreement must be
contingent on securing approval for the site authorization from the governing
body of the city or county;
(e) May limit the type of games and, the number of electronic pull tab devices or
tables for the game of twenty-one per site, the number of sites the governing
body may approve per licensed organization, and the number of sites upon
which a licensed organization may conduct games within the city or county;
and
(e)(f) May establish qualifications for an eligible organization to receive a site
authorization; and
(g) May charge a one hundred dollar fee for a site authorization.

H. B. NO. 1615 - PAGE 2
(2) This subsection may not be construed to prohibit a governing body from:
(a) Creating and enforcing rules that are more stringent than state law regarding
charitable gaming as otherwise permitted in code; or
(b) Denying a site authorization for just cause, including, after consultation with
the attorney general, a violation of state law or local rules.
b. Annually applying for a license from the attorney general before July first on a form
prescribed by the attorney general and remitting a one hundred seventy-five dollar
license fee for each city or county that approves a site authorization. The attorney
general shall deposit twenty-five dollars of this fee into the charitable gaming technology
fund under section 53-06.1-12.4. However, the attorney general may allow an
organization that only conducts a raffle or calcutta in two or more cities or counties to
annually apply for a consolidated license and remit a one hundred seventy-five dollar
license fee for each city or county in which a site is located. The attorney general shall
deposit twenty-five dollars of this fee into the charitable gaming technology fund under
section 53-06.1-12.4. An organization shall document that it qualifies as an eligible
organization. If an organization amends its primary purpose as stated in its articles of
incorporation or materially changes its basic character, the organization shall reapply for
licensure. The attorney general may deny issuance of a license or deny renewal of a
license to an eligible organization that has obtained approval of site authorization under
subdivision a, if the organization or site is not in compliance with applicable laws and
rules.

H. B. NO. 1615 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1615.
House Vote: Yeas 79 Nays 10 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State